Massachusetts, session 194th, S1404.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 12 of chapter 118E of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the ninth paragraph the following paragraphs:-
The division shall certify and ensure that all contracted accountable care organizations,
contracted health insurers, health plans, health maintenance organizations, and behavioral health
management firms and third party administrators under contract to a Medicaid managed care
organization or primary care clinician plan provide equal access to behavioral health services,
benefits and medications of comparable quality in providing medical assistance to recipients.
The division shall obtain the approval of the secretary of the executive office of health
and human services for all behavioral health services, benefits, and medications, including, but
not limited to, policies, protocols, standards, contract specifications, utilization review and
utilization management criteria and outcome measurements, used by all contracted accountable
care organizations, contracted insurers, health plans, health maintenance organizations,
of 2

behavioral health management firms and third party administrators under contract to a Medicaid
managed care organization or primary care clinician plan.
Notwithstanding the provision of any general or special law to the contrary, all contracted
accountable care organizations, contracted health insurers, health plans, health maintenance
organizations and behavioral health management firms and third-party administrators under
contract to a Medicaid managed care clinician plan shall submit its method of determining
reimbursement levels to all network inpatient mental health and substance use providers and how
such methodology is sufficient to meet the costs of providing inpatient care. Such method shall
include, but not be limited to, the range of payment amounts including the median payment
levels and how such payments are regularly updated. A report including this information shall be
submitted on an annual basis from the date of the original submission to the division, the house
and senate committees on ways and means, the committee on health care financing, and the
committee on mental health, substance use and recovery no later than 90 days after the effective
date of this act.
of 2